Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4413
Code of conduct.

The board shall adopt a code of conduct for licensed behavior analysts and licensed assistant behavior analysts. The code of conduct shall be based on the Ethics Code for Behavior Analysts adopted by the certifying entity.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 13.